Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-603
Conservation officers; powers.

All full-time conservation officers are hereby made peace officers of the state with the powers of sheriffs.

Laws 1929, c. 112, VI, § 3, p. 433;

C.S.1929, § 37-603;

R.S.1943, § 37-603;

Laws 1961, c. 175, § 1, p. 522;

Laws 1961, c. 176, § 1, p. 526;

Laws 1971, LB 315, § 1;

Laws 1972, LB 1291, § 1;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 57;

Laws 1988, LB 1030, § 36;

Laws 1989, LB 34, § 35;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-603;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 293.